District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-395.02

Procedures for development of plans.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 731, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11103
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(j), 46 DCR 2118
Mar. 5, 1999, 113 Stat. 3, Pub. L. 106-1, § 3(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-395.2.

Editor's Notes

Section 47-395.2 1981 Ed. had been amended by § 52(j) of D.C. Law 12-264; however, effect was given to the repeal by Pub. L. 106-1.